Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
INVESTMENTS

§412:10-500 Applicability of part.
This part sets forth the requirements and restrictions for investments made by
all credit unions. A credit union may invest its assets as may be permitted by
this part and as may be provided elsewhere in this article. [L 1993, c 350, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next